Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.410

Library-archives building account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The Washington state library-archives building account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 36.18.010(12), 36.22.175(3), and 43.07.370(3) must be deposited in the account. Except for during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the secretary of state may spend up to $8,000,000 from the account for costs associated with the design and construction of the state library-archives building and for costs necessary to prepare the building for occupancy. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2023 c 474 s 8030; 2019 c 448 s 9.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 448: See note following RCW 43.07.405.